Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.217

Juveniles adjudicated of sex offenses—Release of information authorized.

(1) In addition to any other information required to be released under this chapter, the department is authorized, pursuant to RCW 4.24.550, to release relevant information that is necessary to protect the public concerning juveniles adjudicated of sex offenses.

(2) In order for public agencies to have the information necessary for notifying the public about sex offenders as authorized in RCW 4.24.550, the secretary shall issue to appropriate law enforcement agencies narrative notices regarding the pending release of sex offenders from the department's juvenile rehabilitation facilities. The narrative notices shall, at a minimum, describe the identity and criminal history behavior of the offender and shall include the department's risk level classification for the offender. For sex offenders classified as either risk level II or III, the narrative notices shall also include the reasons underlying the classification.

(3) For the purposes of this section, the department shall classify as risk level I those offenders whose risk assessments indicate a low risk of reoffense within the community at large. The department shall classify as risk level II those offenders whose risk assessments indicate a moderate risk of reoffense within the community at large. The department shall classify as risk level III those offenders whose risk assessments indicate a high risk of reoffense within the community at large.

[ 1997 c 364 s 2; 1990 c 3 s 102.]

NOTES:

Severability—1997 c 364: See note following RCW 4.24.550.